Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-802] Judicial dissolution. On
application by a partner, the circuit court may order dissolution of a limited
partnership if it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities of
the limited partnership in conformity with the partnership agreement. [L 2003,
c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next